New York, session 2025-2026, A1902.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subdivision 22 of section 2 265.00 of the penal law, as added by chapter 1 of the laws of 2013, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) a semiautomatic rifle that has an ability to accept a detachable 5 magazine, has a pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the 6 action of the weapon, and has at least one of the following character- 7 istics: 8 (i) a folding or telescoping stock; 9 (ii) [a pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of 10 the weapon; 11 (iii)] a thumbhole stock; 12 [(iv)] (iii) a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held 13 by the non-trigger hand; 14 [(v)] (iv) a bayonet mount; 15 [(vi)] (v) a flash suppressor[, muzzle break, muzzle compensator,] or 16 threaded barrel designed to accommodate a flash suppressor[, muzzle 17 break, or muzzle compensator]; 18 [(vii)] (vi) a grenade launcher; or 19 (b) a semiautomatic shotgun that has at least one of the following 20 characteristics: 21 (i) a folding or telescoping stock; 22 (ii) [a thumbhole stock; 23 (iii)] a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the 24 non-trigger hand; 25 [(iv)] (iii) a fixed magazine capacity in excess of seven rounds; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05458-01-5 A. 1902 2 1 [(v)] (iv) an ability to accept a detachable magazine; or 2 (c) a semiautomatic pistol that has an ability to accept a detachable 3 magazine and has at least one of the following characteristics: 4 (i) a folding or telescoping stock; 5 (ii) a thumbhole stock; 6 (iii) a second handgrip or a protruding grip that can be held by the 7 non-trigger hand; 8 (iv) capacity to accept an ammunition magazine that attaches to the 9 pistol outside of the pistol grip; 10 (v) a threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel extender, flash 11 suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer; 12 (vi) [a shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encir- 13 cles, the barrel and that permits the shooter to hold the firearm with 14 the non-trigger hand without being burned; 15 (vii)] a manufactured weight of fifty ounces or more when the pistol 16 is unloaded; or 17 [(viii)] (vii) a semiautomatic version of an automatic rifle, shotgun 18 or firearm; 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.